Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Virginia Solar Easements Act.

§ 55.1-137.
Creation of solar easements.

Any easement obtained for the purpose of exposure of solar energy equipment, facilities, or devices shall be created in writing and shall be subject to the same conveyancing and instrument recording requirements as other easements.

History.

1978, c. 323, § 55-353; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Guaranteeing Solar Access in Virginia,” see 13 U. Rich. L. Rev. 423 (1979).

For comment, “My Two Cents Per Kilowatt-Hour: Virginia’s Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 755 (2007).

§ 55.1-138.
Contents of solar easement agreements.

Any instrument creating a solar easement shall include, at a minimum:

The vertical and horizontal angles, expressed in degrees, at which the solar easement extends over the real property subject to the solar easement;

Any terms or conditions under which the solar easement is granted or will be terminated; and

Any provisions for compensation of the owner of the property subject to the solar easement.

History.

1978, c. 323, § 55-354; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.